Idaho statutes. Title 61 PUBLIC UTILITY REGULATION
Chapter 12
PACIFIC NORTHWEST ELECTRIC POWER AND
CONSERVATION PLANNING COUNCIL

Sec.

§ 61-1201. Agreement for state participation in the Pacific Northwest Electric Power and Conservation Planning Council.

The state of Idaho agrees to participate in the formation of the “Pacific Northwest Electric Power and Conservation Planning Council,” created pursuant to the pacific northwest electric power planning and conservation act. Nothing in this agreement shall be construed to alter, diminish or abridge the rights of the state of Idaho and its citizens with respect to any water or water related right and those relating to the regulation of the energy industry.

§ 61-1202. Creation — Qualifications of council members.

There is hereby created in the office of the governor, a state office to be known and designated as “Pacific Northwest Electric Power and Conservation Planning Council Member,” as provided in the pacific northwest electric power planning and conservation act. The governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint two (2) persons to the council to undertake the functions and duties of members of the council as specified in that act and appropriate state law. Council members may not hold another public office during their term as council members. They must be qualified electors of the state. Council members shall be appointed on the basis of their experience and education in matters pertaining to the economic, legal, social and political aspects of energy production and distribution, fish and wildlife propagation and protection, and the use, distribution, and protection of state water.

§ 61-1203. Term of office of council members — Filling of vacancies.

Unless removed at the governor’s pleasure, each member appointed to the council shall serve for a term of three (3) years, except that, with respect to members initially appointed, the governor shall designate one (1) member to serve a term of two (2) years and one (1) member to serve a term of three (3) years. Absent removal by the governor, terms shall commence and end on January 15.

Initial appointments to the council shall be made within thirty (30) days of the effective date of this chapter. A vacancy on the council shall be filled for the unexpired term by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate. If such appointment is made during the recess of the legislature, it shall be subject to confirmation during its next ensuing session.

Each member shall serve until a successor is appointed and qualified.

§ 61-1204. Salaries and expenses of council members.

The annual salary of each council member shall be set by the governor. All expenses incurred by a council member pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, including the actual and necessary traveling and other expenses and disbursements incurred while on business of the council, shall be paid from the funds appropriated for the use of the council as provided by federal law. Salary and expense monies shall be paid from federal appropriations as provided for in the pacific northwest electric power planning and conservation act.

§ 61-1205. Office — Technical assistance.

The office of the council members shall be in Ada county. The department of administration shall furnish suitable office space for council members and staff and the department shall be reimbursed for such office space at the rates applicable to state agencies.

Subject to available resources, state agencies may provide technical assistance to council members upon request. State agencies providing technical assistance shall be reimbursed in full for all costs incurred in providing such assistance.

§ 61-1206. Annual reports.

The members of the council shall make and submit on or before the 1st day of January of each year a report to the governor and the legislature that describes the activities of the council. The report shall describe the potential effects the council’s activities will have on economic, environmental, natural resource, energy and water concerns of the state.

§ 61-1207. Legislative intent.

The legislature may, by concurrent resolution, direct to the Idaho council members a statement reflecting legislative intent and concern relative to any actions or activities undertaken or sought to be undertaken by the council.